Utah statutes.
76-10-910.   Falsification of seller's statement to dealer.

Any seller who, in providing any information as required by this part in selling, offering, or attempting to sell regulated metal willfully makes a false statement or provides any untrue information, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 320, 2007 General Session

